District of Columbia statutes.
12-101

Survival of rights of action.

On the death of a person in whose favor or against whom a right of action has accrued for any cause prior to his death, the right of action, for all such cases, survives in favor of or against the legal representative of the deceased.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 509, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
Aug. 2, 1978, D.C. Law 2-95, § 2, 25 DCR 1270
Dissolution of corporations, effect, see §§ 29-101.88, 29-221.16 et seq.
Wrongful death actions, see § 16-2701 et seq.
1981 Ed., § 12-101.
1973 Ed., § 12-101.
Section 24 of D.C. Law 15-354 provided that Title 12 is designated Title 12 of the District of Columbia Official Code.